Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 3. Unauthorized Insurers False Advertising Process Act

§ 26-12-301.
Short title.

This article constitutes and may be cited as the “Unauthorized Insurers False Advertising Process Act”.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 240; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-240; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-110; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-12-302.
False advertising prohibited; notification by commissioner of misrepresentation.

No unauthorized insurer, in any manner, shall misrepresent to any person in this state as to its financial condition or the terms of any contract issued or to be issued by it or the advantages thereof, or the dividends or share of the surplus to be received thereon. If the commissioner believes that any unauthorized insurer is misrepresenting any of the items specified in this section, he shall notify the insurer and the insurance supervisory official of the insurer’s domiciliary state or province by registered or certified mail.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 241; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-241; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-111; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-12-303.
Enforcement by commissioner; penalty for violation.

If within thirty (30) days following the giving of the notice specified in W.S.

26-12-302

the insurer has not ceased dissemination of any false advertising, and if the commissioner believes that the insurer is soliciting, issuing or delivering contracts of insurance to residents of this state or collecting premiums on those contracts or performing any other transaction in connection with that insurance, and that a proceeding by him in respect to those matters would be in the public interest, he shall take action against the insurer under W.S.

26-13-117

.

If pursuant to the proceeding the commissioner finds that the dissemination of false advertising is continuing, he shall order the insurer to desist therefrom and shall mail a copy of the order by certified or registered mail to the insurer at its principal place of business last of record with the commissioner and to the insurance supervisory official of the insurer’s domiciliary state or province. Each violation after mailing of the desist order subjects the insurer to a penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), to be recovered by a civil action the commissioner brings against the insurer. Service of process upon the insurer in the action may be made upon the commissioner pursuant to W.S.

26-12-202

and

26-12-203

or in any other lawful manner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 242; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-242; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-112; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.